Washington statutes.
RCW 41.08.140

Enforcement by civil action—Legal counsel.

It shall be the duty of the commission to begin and conduct all civil suits which may be necessary for the proper enforcement of this chapter and of the rules of the commission. The commission shall be represented in such suits by the chief legal officer of the city, but said commission may in any case be represented by special counsel appointed by it.

[ 1935 c 31 s 15; RRS s 9558-15.]